North Carolina statutes. Chapter 85C. Bail Bondsmen and Runners.
§§ 85C-1 through 85C-41.
[Repealed]

Recodified as Article 71 of Chapter 58.

Editor’s Note.

This Chapter has been recodified as Article 71 of Chapter 58,

G.S. 58-71-1

et seq., under the authority of Session Laws 1987, c. 752, s. 9 and Session Laws 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 975, s. 34.

G.S. 85C-41 was repealed by Session Laws 1983, c. 742, s. 3.